California, session 20252026, AB159.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17138.7 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:17138.7. (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2030, gross income shall not include any qualified amount received by a qualified taxpayer in the taxable year.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Qualified amount” means any amount received from a settlement entity by a qualified taxpayer in connection with a qualified wildfire disaster in California.(2) “Qualified taxpayer” means any of the following:(A) Any taxpayer who owns real property located in an area damaged by a qualified wildfire disaster who paid or incurred expenses, and received qualified amounts from a settlement entity, arising out of or pursuant to the wildfire. qualified wildfire disaster.(B) Any taxpayer who resides within an area damaged by a qualified wildfire disaster who paid or incurred expenses, and received qualified amounts from a settlement entity, arising out of or pursuant to the wildfire. qualified wildfire disaster.(C) Any taxpayer who has a place of business within an area damaged by a qualified wildfire disaster who paid or incurred expenses, and received qualified amounts from a settlement entity, arising out of or pursuant to the wildfire. qualified wildfire disaster.(3) “Qualified wildfire disaster” means any disaster arising from a wildfire for which either the Governor has declared a state of emergency or the President of the United States has declared an emergency or major disaster as defined under the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 5121 et seq.). (3)(4) “Settlement entity” means the entity, approved by an entity making a class action settlement administrator, making the settlement payment payment of a qualified amount to a qualified taxpayer.(c) The settlement entity shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board or qualified taxpayer, documentation of the settlement payments in the form and manner requested by the Franchise Tax Board or the qualified taxpayer.(d) The qualified taxpayer shall provide, upon request, all necessary information in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.(e) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 24309.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:24309.2. (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2030, gross income shall not include any qualified amount received by a qualified taxpayer in the taxable year.(b) For purposes of this section the following definitions apply:(1) “Qualified amount” means any amount received from a settlement entity by a qualified taxpayer in connection with a qualified wildfire disaster in California.(2) “Qualified taxpayer” means any of the following:(A) Any taxpayer that owns real property located in an area damaged by a qualified wildfire disaster that paid or incurred expenses, and received qualified amounts from a settlement entity, arising out of or pursuant to the wildfire. qualified wildfire disaster.(B) Any taxpayer that has a place of business within an area damaged by a qualified wildfire disaster that paid or incurred expenses, and received qualified amounts from a settlement entity, arising out of or pursuant to the wildfire. qualified wildfire disaster.(3) “Qualified wildfire disaster” means any disaster arising from a wildfire for which either the Governor has declared a state of emergency or the President of the United States has declared an emergency or major disaster as defined under the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 5121 et seq.). (3)(4) “Settlement entity” means the entity, approved by an entity making a class action settlement administrator, making the settlement payment payment of a qualified amount to a qualified taxpayer.(c) The settlement entity shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board or qualified taxpayer, documentation of the settlement payments in the form and manner requested by the Franchise Tax Board or the qualified taxpayer.(d) The qualified taxpayer shall provide, upon request, all necessary information in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.(e) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. The sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Franchise Tax Board to administer qualified wildfire disaster settlements pursuant to Sections 17138.7 and 24309.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.SEC. 4. This act is a bill providing for appropriations related to the Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution, has been identified as related to the budget in the Budget Bill, and shall take effect immediately.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact statutory changes relating to the Budget Act of 2025.